Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [317A.910] PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES; BAIL ABATEMENT. new text end new text begin (a) A nonprofit corporation is prohibited from organizing or registering under this chapter to engage in providing payment to a person or to a state court in order to satisfy a bail condition determined by the court. new text end new text begin (b) This section may be cited as the "Bail Abatement Nonprofit Exclusion (BANE) Act." new text end